Hawaii, session 2026, SB2941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that disposable bodyboards are often comprised of polystyrene, also known as Styrofoam. Polystyrene, once discarded, can quickly disintegrate, leaving behind plastic foam that can pollute the State's reefs, shoreline, and marine ecosystems.  Recently, the Kauai county council unanimously passed a bill banning the sale, rental, or distribution of these disposable bodyboards to reflect their commitment to maintaining Kauai's unique marine environment.  A statewide ban would comprehensively expand this positive environmental policy and support a shift towards durable, reusable options to reduce waste, support responsible tourism, and promote a smaller environmental footprint. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit the sale, rental, or distribution of disposable bodyboards in the State. SECTION 2. Chapter 342D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§342D-    Sale, rental, and distribution of disposable bodyboards; prohibition.  (a)  Beginning January 1, , it shall be unlawful to sell, offer for sale, rent, or distribute for sale in the State any disposable bodyboard. (b)  Any person who violates this section shall be fined: (1)  $100 for a first violation; (2)  $200 for a section violation; and (3)  $500 for each subsequent violation in the same year. Each day of continued violation under this section shall constitute a distinct and separate offense. (c) For the purposes of this section "disposable bodyboard" means a buoyant rectangular object over twenty-three inches in length with a polystyrene foam core used for water recreation." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________